South Dakota, session 2026, HB1221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-16G:
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 53-9-8, an individual employed by the
Governor's Office of Economic Development may not, for a period of five years after
termination of employment with the office, accept compensation or employment from, or
enter into a contractual relationship with, any person that, during the individual's
employment with the Governor's Office of Economic Development, received, directly or
indirectly:
(1) Any grant, loan, moneys, or other financial assistance administered by the
Governor's Office of Economic Development; or
(2) Moneys from the employer's investment in South Dakota's future fund established
pursuant to § 61-5-29.1.
A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.